Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2947.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 15-101 of Title 43A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in this section:
1. "Behavioral health clinical intern" means a graduate student
enrolled in a nationally accredited clinical training program that
meets minimum credentials for service provided or code billed;
2. "Clinical training program" means programs of study that are
nationally accredited master's or doctoral programs preparing
students for the licensed marital and family therapist (LMFT),
licensed professional counselor (LPC), licensed clinical social
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2947 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

work er (LCSW), licensed alcohol and drug counselor (LADC), or
psychologist state licensures to practice;
3. "Licensed behavioral health provider" means a behavioral
health professional who is a licensed professional counselor (LPC),
licensed marital and family therapist (LMFT), licensed behavioral
practitioner (LBP), licensed clinical social worker (LCSW), licensed
alcohol and drug counselor (LADC), or licensed psychologist; and
4. "Nationally accredited program" means that the training
program has met all training standards to hold an active
accreditation aligned with the discipline of study, including, but
not limited to, the Commission on Accreditation for Marriage and
Family Therapy Education (COAMFTE), the Council for Accreditation of
Counseling and Related Educational Programs (CACREP), the Council on
Social Work Education (CSWE), or the American Psychological
Association (APA).
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 15-102 of Title 43A, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Medicaid plan administrator shall expand services
by adding a provider code for master's and doctoral level behavioral
health clinical interns.
Behavioral health clinical intern providers shall only provide
services billable through clinical sites that are accredited in good
standing with behavioral health services site accreditations such
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2947 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

as: the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation Facilities
(CARF), The Joint Commission, the American Society of Addiction
Medicine (ASAM) Level of Care Certification, program certification
through the Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services, the Council on Accreditation (COA), or other national
behavioral health service site accrediting body.
Behavioral health clinical interns may provide services within
their clinical scope of practice under the on-site supervision of a
licensed behavioral health provider. On-site supervisors may only
supervise six or fewer behavioral health clinical interns at any
time.
Behavioral health clinical interns shall comply with all
registration, training, documentation, and protocols required of
other behavioral health providers in the Oklahoma Medicaid plan.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 22, 2026 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2947 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)